Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202286-1219
Microwireless facility, defined.

Microwireless facility means a small wireless facility that is not larger in dimension than twenty-four inches in length, fifteen inches in width, and twelve inches in height and with any exterior antenna no longer than eleven inches.

Laws 2019, LB184, § 19.